test/src/morphology/N-neetsha_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - nētša: # Noun 58 'eng /est neiuke/fin' - full paradigm
     nētša+N+Sg+Nom: nētša
     nētša+N+Sg+Gen: nētša
     nētša+N+Sg+Par: nētšazt
     nētša+N+Sg+Dat: nētšan
     nētša+N+Sg+Ins: nētšaks
     nētša+N+Sg+Ill: nētšaz
     nētša+N+Sg+Ela: nētšast
     nētša+N+Pl+Nom: nētšad
     nētša+N+Pl+Gen: nētšad
     nētša+N+Pl+Par: nētšidi
     nētša+N+Pl+Dat: nētšadõn
     nētša+N+Pl+Ins: nētšadõks
     nētša+N+Pl+Ill: nētšiz
     nētša+N+Pl+Ela: nētšist
